src/morphology/stems/prefixes.lexc
!! Prefixes
!  --------
!! Prefixes in the LUO language are bound to beginning of other words.

LEXICON Prefixes
nounprefix-     Nouns   ;
@U.Sc.NO@     Verbs   ;
000@U.TMA1-IndPrt.YES@:ne%<@U.TMA1-IndPrt.YES@ SC-PL-PERSON ;
00@U.TMA1-IndPrt.YES@:n%<@U.TMA1-IndPrt.YES@ SC-SG-PERSON ;
@U.TMA1-IndPrt.NO@  SC-PERSON ;
000000@U.TMA1.OptPrs@:dipop%<@U.TMA1.OptPrs@  SC-PERSON ;

LEXICON SC-PERSON
 SC-PL-PERSON ;
 SC-SG-PERSON ;
LEXICON SC-PL-PERSON
00@U.Sc.Pl1@:wa%<@U.Sc.Pl1@ TMA-AFTER-SC-PERSON ;
00@U.Sc.Pl2@:u%<@U.Sc.Pl2@ TMA-AFTER-SC-PERSON ;
00@U.Sc.Pl3@:gi%<@U.Sc.Pl3@ TMA-AFTER-SC-PERSON ;

LEXICON SC-SG-PERSON
00@U.Sc.Sg1@:a%<@U.Sc.Sg1@ TMA-AFTER-SC-PERSON ;
00@U.Sc.Sg2@:i%<@U.Sc.Sg2@ TMA-AFTER-SC-PERSON ;
00@U.Sc.Sg3@:o%<@U.Sc.Sg3@ TMA-AFTER-SC-PERSON ;


LEXICON TMA-AFTER-SC-PERSON
@U.TMA1-IndPrt.YES@@U.TMA1.IndPrt@ Verbs   ;
@U.TMA1-IndPrt.NO@@U.TMA1.IndPrs@ Verbs   ;
@U.TMA1.OptPrs@ Verbs ;
0000@U.TMA1-IndPrt.NO@@U.TMA1.IndFut@:bro%<@U.TMA1-IndPrt.NO@@U.TMA1.IndFut@ Verbs   ;
00000@U.TMA1-IndPrt.NO@@U.TMA1.IndFut@:biro%<@U.TMA1-IndPrt.NO@@U.TMA1.IndFut@ Verbs   ;
000@U.TMA1-IndPrt.NO@@U.TMA1.IndFut@:bo%<@U.TMA1-IndPrt.NO@@U.TMA1.IndFut@ Verbs   ;
000@U.TMA2.se@@U.TMA1-IndPrt.NO@@U.TMA1.IndPrs@:se%<@U.TMA2.se@@U.TMA1-IndPrt.NO@@U.TMA1.IndPrs@ Verbs   ;
000@U.TMA2.se@@U.TMA1-IndPrt.YES@@U.TMA1.IndPrt@:se%<@U.TMA2.se@@U.TMA1-IndPrt.YES@@U.TMA1.IndPrt@ Verbs   ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
